Illinois, session 104th, SB2627.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 2-1115 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/2-1115)  (from Ch. 110, par. 2-1115)7    Sec. 2-1115. Punitive damages not recoverable in healing 8art and legal malpractice cases. In all cases, whether in 9tort, contract or otherwise, in which the plaintiff seeks 10damages by reason of legal, medical, hospital, or other 11healing art malpractice, no punitive, exemplary, vindictive or 12aggravated damages shall be allowed. This prohibition on the 13recovery of punitive damages in a legal malpractice action 14includes damages sought as compensatory damages which were 15assessed against the legal malpractice plaintiff or failed to 16be obtained by the legal malpractice plaintiff. 17(Source: P.A. 84-7.)